New York, session 2025-2026, A8079.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 530 of the laws of 2024 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing an occupancy tax in the village of Medi- 3 na, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire December 5 31, [2025] 2027, when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 6 deemed repealed. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07085-02-5